aspell-manchu/mnc_affix.dat
# 
# References
#
# Paul Georg von Möllendorff (1892). A Manchu Grammar with Aanalysed Texts. 
#         [http://archive.org/details/cu31924023341112]
#
SET	UTF-8

# Noun Case
SFX N Y 6
SFX N 0 0 .         #
SFX N 0 ni ng       # Genitive
SFX N 0 i .   
SFX N 0 be .        # Accusative
SFX N 0 de .        # Dative/Locative
SFX N 0 ci .        # Ablative

# Noun plural
SFX s Y 4
SFX s 0 sa [avui]
SFX s n sa n
SFX s 0 se [eu]
SFX s 0 so o

SFX t Y 2
SFX t 0 ta [au]
SFX t 0 te [eu]


# Verb
SFX V Y 39
SFX V 0 0 .          # Imperative
SFX V 0 mbi .        # Present (I write)
SFX V 0 mbikai .     # 
SFX V 0 mbihe .      # Imperfect (I was writing)
SFX V 0 mbihebi .    #
SFX V 0 mbime .      # Gerend I. (whilst writing)
SFX V 0 mbifi .      # Gerend II. (having written)
SFX V 0 mbini .
SFX V 0 mbumbi .     # Passive (it is written)
SFX V 0 mbubumbi .   # Causative/Passive (I cause to be written)
SFX V 0 me .         # Infinitive (to write)
SFX V 0 meo .         # Infinitive (to write)
SFX V 0 ra [av]      # Future (I shall write)
SFX V 0 re [eui]
SFX V 0 ro o
SFX V 0 rade [av]    # Future (I shall write)
SFX V 0 rede [eui]
SFX V 0 rangge [av] #
SFX V 0 rengge [eui]  #
SFX V 0 rongge o  #
SFX V 0 rale [av]
SFX V 0 rele [eui]
SFX V 0 ralengge [av]
SFX V 0 relengge [eui]
SFX V 0 ralame [avi]
SFX V 0 relame [eu]
SFX V 0 lame [avi]
SFX V 0 leme [eu]
SFX V 0 ci .         # Conditional (should I write)
SFX V 0 cibe .       # Adversative (although he may write)
SFX V 0 cina .       # Concessive (may he write)
SFX V 0 ki .         # Subjunctive Present (may he write)
SFX V 0 kini .       # Optative (would that he wrote)
SFX V 0 nggala [avi] # Gerund III. (before writing)
SFX V 0 nggele [eu]     
SFX V 0 nggolo o
SFX V 0 rakv .
SFX V 0 rakvngge [avi]
SFX V 0 rekvngge [eu]

# Verb -fi form
SFX f Y 1
SFX f 0 fi .         # Past Gerund (having written)

# Verb -pi form
SFX p Y 1
SFX p 0 pi .         # Past Gerund (having written)

# Verb -h[aeo] form
SFX h Y 34
SFX h 0 ha [auvi]     # Preterite (I wrote)
SFX h 0 he [eui]        
SFX h 0 ho o
SFX h 0 hade [auvi]     # Preterite (I wrote)
SFX h 0 hede [eu]        
SFX h 0 hode o
SFX h 0 habi [auvi]   # Indefinite Past (I have written)
SFX h 0 hebi [eu]
SFX h 0 hobi o
SFX h 0 habikai [auvi]
SFX h 0 hebikai [eu]
SFX h 0 hobikai o
SFX h 0 habihe [auvi] # Pluperfect (I had written)
SFX h 0 hebihe [eu]
SFX h 0 hobihe o
SFX h 0 habici [auvi] # Past Conditional (if I had written)
SFX h 0 hebici [eu]
SFX h 0 hobici o
SFX h 0 hangge [auvi] #
SFX h 0 hengge [eu]  #
SFX h 0 hongge [eu]  #
SFX h 0 hale   [auvi] #
SFX h 0 hele   [eu]   #
SFX h 0 halengge   [auvi] #
SFX h 0 helengge   [eu]  #
SFX h 0 hakv [auvi]
SFX h 0 hekv [eu]
SFX h 0 hokv o
SFX h 0 hakvbi [auvi]
SFX h 0 hekvbi [eu]
SFX h 0 hokvbi o
SFX h 0 hai [auvi]
SFX h 0 hei [eu]
SFX h 0 hoi o

# Verb -k[aeo] form
SFX k Y 25
SFX k 0 ka [auvi]     # Preterite (I wrote)
SFX k 0 ke [eu]        
SFX k 0 ko o
SFX k 0 kabi [auvi]   # Indefinite Past (I have written)
SFX k 0 kebi [eu]
SFX k 0 kobi o
SFX k 0 kabihe [auvi] # Pluperfect (I had written)
SFX k 0 kebihe [eu]
SFX k 0 kobihe o
SFX k 0 kabici [auvi] # Past Conditional (if I had written)
SFX k 0 kebici [eu]
SFX k 0 kobici o
SFX k 0 kangge [auvi] #
SFX k 0 kengge [eu]  #
SFX k 0 kongge [eu]  #
SFX k 0 kale   [auvi] #
SFX k 0 kele   [eu]   #
SFX k 0 kalengge   [auvi] #
SFX k 0 kelengge   [eu]  #
SFX k 0 kakv [auvi]
SFX k 0 kekv [eu]
SFX k 0 kokv o
SFX k 0 kai [auvi]
SFX k 0 kei [eu]
SFX k 0 koi o
